District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-1019

Minimum recycled content percentage requirements.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 22
as added Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-208, § 2, 37 DCR 8458
July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-130, § 2(a), 39 DCR 4054
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 19(a), 40 DCR 6311
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-1020, § 8-1021, and § 8-1022.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3419.

Editor's Notes

For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.